Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1227.01
Suits against governmental bodies; authorized.

The state, governmental agencies, and political subdivisions may be sued upon claims arising under sections 48-1219 to 48-1227 in the same manner as provided by such sections for suits against other employers.

Laws 1983, LB 424, § 6.